src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/N-asi47_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - asi: # Noun (47) asi 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     asi+N+Sg+Nom: asi
     asi+N+Sg+Gen: aśa
     asi+N+Sg+Par: asja
     asi+N+Sg+Ill: asja
     asi+N+Sg+Ine: [aśan, aśah, aśahn]
     asi+N+Sg+Ela: aśast
     asi+N+Sg+All: aśalõ
     asi+N+Sg+Ade: aśal
     asi+N+Sg+Abl: aśalt
     asi+N+Sg+Tra: aśas
     asi+N+Sg+Ter: aśaniq
     asi+N+Sg+Abe: aśaldaq
     asi+N+Sg+Com: aśagaq
     asi+N+Pl+Nom: aśaq
     asi+N+Pl+Gen: asjo
     asi+N+Pl+Par: asjo
     asi+N+Pl+Ill: [asjohe, asjo, asjodõ]
     asi+N+Pl+Ine: [aśon, aśoh, aśohn]
     asi+N+Pl+Ela: aśost
     asi+N+Pl+All: aśolõ
     asi+N+Pl+Ade: aśol
     asi+N+Pl+Abl: aśolt
     asi+N+Pl+Tra: aśos
     asi+N+Pl+Ter: aśoniq
     asi+N+Pl+Abe: aśoldaq
     asi+N+Pl+Com: asjogaq
